Georgia, session 2025_26, HB499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to sales and use
taxes, is amended by revising paragraph (50) of Code Section 48-8-3, relating to exemptions
from state sales and use taxes, as follows:
"(50)(A) Sales of insulin syringes and blood glucose level measuring strips dispensed
without a prescription.
(B) The sale or use of menstrual discharge collection devices, as such term is defined
in the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement as of May 16, 2024;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 499
- 1 -